Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1178
Member of any commission, committee, or board created by statute; expenses; reimbursement; manner.

Any member of any state commission, council, committee, or board which has been created by statute shall be entitled to be reimbursed for expenses in the same manner as provided in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177 for state employees whether or not specific reference is made to such sections.

Laws 1977, LB 365, § 2;

Laws 1981, LB 204, § 213;

R.S.1943, (1981), § 84-306.06.